Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201660-346.01
Public power district, defined.

Public power district means a district as defined by section 70-601 receiving annual gross revenue of at least forty million dollars as determined by the Nebraska Power Review Board.

Laws 2016, LB783, § 5.
January 1, 2017